src/hyphenation/hyphenation.xfscript
! =============================== !
!        Hyphenator for Buryad    !
! =============================== !

echo << defining Cns and Vow... >>

define Vow [ а | е | ё | и | о | ө | у | ү | ы | э | ю | я | 
             А | Е | Ё | И | О | Ө | У | Ү | Ы | Э | Ю | Я ] ;

define Cns [ б | в | г | д | ж | з | й | к | л | м | н | п | 
             р | с | т | ф | х | һ | ц | ч | ш | щ | ь | ъ | 
             Б | В | Г | Д | Ж | З | Й | К | Л | М | Н | П | 
             Р | С | Т | Ф | Х | Һ | Ц | Ч | Ш | Щ | Ь | Ъ ] ;

define Sgm [ Cns | Vow ] ;
define Sign [ ь | Ь | ъ | Ъ ] ;
             
define JVow [ e | ё | ю | я | Е | Ё | Ю | Я ] ;           
define S [ с | С | ш | Ш ] ;

echo << and now the rules >>

define beforeSign  [..] -> %^  || Cns Sign _ Segm+ Vow ; ! таль-хи
define CsCV        [..] -> %^  || Vow Cns* _ S Cns Vow ; ! Крон-штадт, Бородин-ский, Бай-каль-ска-я
define beforeCJV   [..] -> %^  || Sgm Vow Sgm* _ Cns JVow ;  ! бу-ряад & зал-гяад
define beforeJV    [..] -> %^  || Sgm Vow      _ JVow ;      ! ха-яа
define beforeCV    [..] -> %^  || [Vow Sgm+|Sgm Vow] _ Cns   Vow ; ! хэ-рэг-лэ

! Lagre denne fila: i xfst: source < dennefila.txt og deretter: save hy.fst
! cat fil.txt | preprocess | ./lookup -utf8 hy.fst | cut -f2 | tr '\n' ' ' | less


echo <<Combining...>>

read regex [ 
    beforeSign 
.o. CsCV 
.o. beforeCJV 
.o. beforeJV 
.o. beforeCV 
] ;
